Final source/morphy/foma/a6.lexc
!!!ClassOne.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N % +verb% %|% +part  +past% %=த்% %|% Part +PresPart +3P +2P +1P +past% %=த்% %|%  +Pres +Fut +Sg +Pl +Masc +Fem +Rat +Irr +Euph +Sandhi +Neg +Comp +Imp +Inf +RelPart +Con +Causal +Temp +Neu +PartNoun % +verb% %|% erbNoun +gerundPres +presParticiple

LEXICON Root

ClassA6 ;

LEXICON ClassA6

බස්ස 	CA6Vinf;
පද්ද	CA6Vinf;
නග්ග	CA6Vinf;
රක්ක	CA6Vinf;
වන්ද	CA6Vinf;
බන්ද	CA6Vinf;
ගන්න	CA6Vinf;
දන්න	CA6Vinf;
පන්න	CA6Vinf;
මද්ද	CA6Vinf;
බද්ද	CA6Vinf;
හප්ප	CA6Vinf;
වද්ද	CA6Vinf;

අස්වද්ද	CA6Vinf;
අත්දක්ක	CA6Vinf;
පිරිමද්ද	CA6Vinf;
පිලිපද්ද	CA6Vinf;
	
ඇවිද්ද	CA6Vinf;
	
නැගිට්ට	CA6Vinf;

ඉස්ස	CA6Vinf;

අන්ද	CA6Vinf;

පලන්ද 	CA6Vinf;


LEXICON CA6Vinf


% +verb:^ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3pl:^ති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +3sg:^ත්වා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^නවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^නවාලා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^නු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^න්න #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sgf:^න්නීය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1sg:^න්නෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1sg:^න්නෙමිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1pl:^න්නෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1pl:^න්නෙමුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +2sg:^න්නෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +2sg:^න්නෙහිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sg:^න්නේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3pl:^න්නෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^පන් #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^පල්ලා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1sg:^මි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1sg:^මිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1pl:^මු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1pl:^මුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sg:^යි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^ව #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3pl:^වති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3sgf:^වන්නීය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1sg:^වන්නෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1pl:^වන්නෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2sg:^වන්නෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2pl :^වන්නෙහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3sg:^වන්නේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3pl:^වන්නෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1sg:^වමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1pl:^වමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3sg:^වයි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2sg:^වහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2pl:^වහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^වු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +2sg:^හි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +2sg:^හිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^හු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2pl:^හුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +3sg:^ාවා #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +mixV:^මින් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +preV:^ා #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න්නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^වන්නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^නලද #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^නුලැබූ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^වමින් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ද්දී #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past:^නලදී #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ුණු #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ූ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +1sg:^ෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +1pl:^ෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +2sg:^ෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +2pl:^ෙහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3sgf:^ාය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3sg:^ේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3pl:^ෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^ේ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^ෙයි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3pl:^ෙති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^වෙයි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3pl:^වෙති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^වේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ිය #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ුවොත් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ුවේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න්නේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +preV:^වා #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +caus% +non:^වන්නේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^නුයේ #;
